North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-19 Forestry and Tree Distribution [Repealed]

4-19-01.
State forester — Appointment — Qualifications — Duties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 170, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 1679a; R.C. 1943, § 4-1901; S.L. 1971, ch. 92, § 1; 1987, ch. 87, § 1; 1995, ch. 70, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-19-01.1.
District foresters — Qualifications. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 70, § 5.

4-19-01.2.
State forester reserve account. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 68, § 1; 2007, ch. 62, § 1; 2007, ch. 63, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-19-01.3.
Powers — Cooperative state agreements. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 70, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-19-02.
State nursery — Maintenance — Purpose. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 170, § 2; C.L. 1913, § 1679b; R.C. 1943, § 4-1902; S.L. 1995, ch. 70, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-19-03.
Distribution of seeds and planting stock. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 170, § 3; C.L. 1913, § 1679c; S.L. 1929, ch. 220, § 1; 1939, ch. 243, § 1; 1941, ch. 13, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 4-1903; S.L. 1989, ch. 32, § 13; 1995, ch. 70, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-19-04.
Information and assistance furnished to applicant. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 70, § 5.

4-19-05.
State forester may accept land for forestry purposes. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 215, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 4-1906; S.L. 1979, ch. 101, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-19-06.
Obligations incurred in acquiring land — How paid. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 215, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 4-1906; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-19-07.
Powers of state forester when lands acquired or leased. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 215, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 4-1907; S.L. 1979, ch. 101, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-19-08.
Revenue received from lands acquired or leased — Regulations governing. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 215, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 4-1908; S.L. 1979, ch. 101, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-19-09.
State forester may sell, exchange, or lease lands acquired. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 215, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 4-1909; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-19-10.
Agreements for shelterbelt lands by state. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 225, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1943, § 4-1910; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.